Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB102.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.197 is amended to read as follows:
An individual employed as a Trooper R Class or a commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class shall:
(1) Be a retired officer who prior to retirement was commissioned as an officer under this chapter;
(2) Be a retired member of the State Police Retirement System established by KRS 16.505 to 16.652 or the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.510 to 61.705, who retired with at least
twenty (20) years of service credit;
(3) Upon appointment to Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement officer R class, have been separated
from the service of the Department of Kentucky State Police for a period no less than one (1) month nor
greater than sixty (60) months following:
(a) The individual's effective retirement date from the State Police Retirement System or the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System; or
(b) The individual's latest separation date from the service of the Department of Kentucky State Police if
the individual has previously been appointed to Trooper R Class or commercial vehicle enforcement
officer R class;
(4) Have retired willingly with no administrative charges against the officer pending under KRS 16.140 or 16.192;
and
(5) Have retired with no pre-existing agreement between the employee and the department prior to the employee's
retirement for the employee to return to work with the department.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical for the immediate and long-term safety of the Commonwealth to allow
previously appointed troopers to return to service with the Department of Kentucky State Police, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 9, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version